Utah statutes.
53-9-106.   Meetings -- Hearings.
(1)  The board shall meet quarterly, unless the board has no business to
conduct during that quarter, and shall also meet at the call of the chair.
(2)  A quorum consists of three members.
(3)  If a member has three unexcused absences within a 12-month period, the
board may hold a hearing to determine if that board member should be released
from board duties.
